Arkansas, session 2025, SB436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1904(f)(1), concerning the
participation in an extracurricular activity of a student who transfers to
another public school or a nonresident district under the Public School
Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1)(A) A student who transfers to another public school or a
nonresident district under this subchapter shall not be:
(A)(i) Denied participation in an extracurricular
activity at the public school or nonresident district to which he or she
transfers based exclusively on his or her decision to transfer to the public
school or nonresident district; or
(B)(ii) Disciplined in any manner based exclusively
on the exercise of his or her right to transfer to another public school or a
nonresident district under this subchapter.
*TNL311*
03/11/2025 4:58:46 PM TNL311

SB436
(B) However, a student who transfers to another public
school or a nonresident district under this subchapter for two (2)
consecutive years may be prohibited by the public school or nonresident
district to which he or she transfers from participating in an
extracurricular activity at the public school or nonresident district for a
period of three hundred sixty-five (365) days.






























03/11/2025 4:58:46 PM TNL311